District of Columbia statutes.
28-2103

Assignee.

Only a resident of the District of Columbia may be an assignee in an assignment for the benefit of creditors. His assent shall appear in writing in, or at the end of, or indorsed on, the assignment. An assignment is invalid unless acknowledged and recorded within five days after its execution in the land records of the District. A trust created by an assignment shall be executed under the supervision and control of the court having probate jurisdiction.

Aug. 30, 1964, 78 Stat. 668, Pub. L. 88-509, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 569, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 151(a)
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-255, § 27(a), 44 DCR 1271
Civil jurisdiction, probate, see §§ 11-501 and 11-921.
This section is referenced in § 28-2105.
1981 Ed., § 28-2103.
1973 Ed., § 28-2103.